Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.10
Adopted person; contact child placement agency or department; when.

If an adopted person twenty-one years of age or older, after following the procedures set forth in sections 43-146.04 and 43-146.05, is unable to obtain information about the adopted person's relatives and there is no unrevoked nonconsent form as provided in section 43-146.06 on file with the department, such person may then contact the child placement agency which handled the adoption or the department.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 51;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 99.